apertium-sah.sah.twol
"vowel harmony after {О}"
Vx:Vy <=  %{О%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{☭%}: | ImaginaryVow: | %{A%}: | %{I%}: ] ] | :ь ]* _ ;
      except
          ! following exceptions needed to avoid conflicts with {A} harmony
          :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
          :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
          %{☭%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
          .#. ( :Cons (:ь) ) RealVow: RealVow: %>: (%{A%}:) _ ;
          _ %>: %{I%}: [ %{I%}: | %{A%}: ]  ;
      where Vx in ( %{A%} %{I%} )
            Vy in (   а     ы   )
      matched ;

"vowel harmony for {H}"
%{H%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( ы у ы у и и и ү ү ы )
         matched ;


!!FIXME! ф а к у л ь т е т {☭}:0 >:0 {n}: {I}:

!@ б у о л >:0 {I}:у {A}:а х >:0 т {A}:а {A}:а х

"vowel harmony for {A} except after уо and үө"
%{A%}:Vy <=  [ :Vx - %{О%}: ] [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ [ :0 - [ %{☭%}: | ImaginaryVow: ] ] | :ь ]* _ ;
             ! :Cons :Vx _ ;  ! FIXME: When does this happen?
             %{A%}:Vx _ ;
         except
             :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
             :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
             ! :Vow :Vow %>: _ ; 
             !    ! for verb stems ending in long vowel or diphthong
             !%{ъ%}: %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ; 
             %{☭%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
             .#. ( :Cons (:ь) ) RealVow: RealVow: %>: (%{A%}:) _ ;
				 _ %>: %{I%}: [ %{I%}: | %{A%}: ]  ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( а о а а э э э ө э а )
         matched ;

"{A} as part of {I}{A}"
%{A%}:Vy <=  %{I%}:Vx _ ;
         except
             :RealVow :RealVow %>: %{I%}:Vx _ ;
             _ %>: %{I%}: [ %{I%}: | %{A%}: ] ;   ! FIXME: figure out what to do in this context at some point
         where Vx in ( и ү ы у )
               Vy in ( э ө а о )
         matched ;

"{A} deletes after long vowels and diphthongs and triggers other stuff (and as part of {I}{A})"
%{A%}:0 <=> :RealVow :RealVow %>: (%{I%}:) _ ;
            .#. ( :Cons (:ь) ) RealVow: RealVow: %>: (%{A%}:) _ ;
            _ %>: %{I%}: [ %{I%}: | %{A%}: ]  ;  ! "{A} as nothing before {I}{I} and {I}{A}"

"{I} deletes after long vowels and diphthongs and triggers other stuff"
%{I%}:0 <=> :RealVow :RealVow %>: _ ;
            :RealVow :RealVow %>: %{I%}: _ ;

"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before ({I}){A} and after unrounded vowels"
Vx:Vy <=> :UnRoundVow/[ :Cons | :0 ]* _ :RealVow %>: (%{I%}:) %{A%}: ;
      except
          _ RealVow: %>: %{A%}: %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before ({I}){A} and after rounded vowels"
Vx:Vy <=> :RoundVow/[ :Cons | :0 ]* _ :RealVow %>: (%{I%}:) %{A%}: ;
      except
          _ RealVow: %>: %{A%}: %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( у у ү ү )
      matched ;

"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {m}{i}м"
Vx:Vy <=> _ LowVow: %>: %{m%}: %{i%}: м: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

!@ а һ а:ы а >:0 {i}:0 м >:0 {I}:ы {A}:а н

!"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {I}{A}"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ :RealVow %>: %{I%}: %{A%}: ;
!      where Vx in ( э а о ө )
!            Vy in ( и ы у ү )
!      matched ;

"second element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {A} unround"
Vx:Vy <=> :UnRoundVow _ %>: %{A%}: ;
      except
          _ %>: %{A%}: %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

"second element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {A} round"
Vx:Vy <=> :RoundVow _ %>: %{A%}: ;
      except
          _ %>: %{A%}: %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( у у ү ү )
      matched ;

!@ ү ө с к э:ү э:ү >:0 {A}:0 р

"second element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {I}{A} round"
Vx:Vy <=> :RoundVow _ %>: %{I%}: %{A%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а э )
            Vy in ( у ө )
      matched ;

!@ ү ө с к э:ү э:ө >:0 {I}:0 {A}:0 н

"first element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {I}{I}"
Vx:Vy <=> _ :RealVow %>: %{I%}: %{I%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

"second element of diphthongs and long vowels immediately before {I}{I}"
Vx:Vy <=> _ %>: %{I%}: %{I%}: ;
      where Vx in ( а о э ө )
            Vy in ( ы у и ү )
      matched ;

"vowel harmony for {a} except after уо and үө"
%{a%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ [ :0 - ImaginaryVow: ] | :ь ]* _ ;
         except
             :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
             :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons]/:0* _ ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( а о а а э э э ө э а )
         matched ;

"vowel harmony for {a} after үө"
%{a%}:э <=> :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - ImaginaryVow: ]* _ ;

!FIXME 
"vowel harmony for {I} after back harmony marker"
%{I%}:Vy <= :Vx [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - ImaginaryVow: ]* _ ;
            ! [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ;            
         except
            :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
         where Vx in ( а о ы у э е и ө ү я )
               Vy in ( ы у ы у ы ы ы ы ы ы )
         matched ;

"vowel harmony for {i} after back harmony marker"
%{i%}:ы <= :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - ImaginaryVow: ]* _ ;
            ! [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ;            
        except
            :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;




!!!== Defaults that shouldn't be necessary ==!!!

"{G} after high vowel"
%{G%}:г <=> [ :HighVow | ImaginaryHighVow: ] [ [ :0 - [ Imaginary: | %{D%}: ] ] | %-: ]* _ ;
            [ [ :HighSonCns | [ л: - :0 ] | %{йр%}: | %{л%}: ] - :Nasal ] [ [ :0 - [ Imaginary: | %{D%}: ] ] | %-: ]*  _ ;

!@ с ы л >:0 {G}:г {A}:а


"vowel harmony for {A} after уо etc."
! shouldn't need a rule because it's the default а, but doesn't seem to work without one
%{A%}:а <=  :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - ImaginaryVow: ]* _ ;
            ! %{ъ%}: %>: [ :Cons* ]/:0* _ ;            
            :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons %{☭%}: ]/[ :0 - [ %{☭%}: | ImaginaryVow: ] ]* _ ;
            :Vow [ :Cons* %{☭%}: :Cons ]/[ :0 - [ %{☭%}: | ImaginaryVow: ] ]* _ ;
            :Vow [ %{☭%}: :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - [ %{☭%}: | ImaginaryVow: ] ]* _ ;
            ! :Cons/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] %{☭%}: _ ;
            ! %{☭%}: :Cons/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] _ ;
            ! :Vow %{☭%}: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
               !компьютер{ъ}>{L}{A}р
               !@ Д ь о к у у с к а й >:0 {T}:д {A}:а {A}:а ҕ {I}:ы
            ! :Vow [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* %{☭%}: _ ;
            ! :Vow [ :Cons* %{☭%}: :Cons ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ]* _ ;
        except
            :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;
               ! protects against үө forms with %{☭%} (haha!)
            _ %>: %{I%}: [ %{I%}: | %{A%}: ]  ;


"vowel harmony for {A} after үө"
%{A%}:э <=  :ү :ө [ :Cons* :Cons ]/[ :0 - ImaginaryVow: ]* _ ;
        except
!             %{ъ%}: %>: [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ; 
            _ %>: %{I%}: [ %{I%}: | %{A%}: ]  ;

!@ б а р >:0 {I}:ы {A}:а н

"vowel harmony for {a} after уо"
! shouldn't need a rule because it's the default а, but doesn't seem to work without one
%{a%}:а <=> :у :о [ :Cons* :Cons ]/:0* _ ;

!"Epenthesis in some stems"
!%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cons :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
!   !@ ис{y}т>{A}{р}

"Delete т after н or с when not at the end of a word"
т:0 <=> [ :н | :с | :к ] _ %>:/[ :0 - %>: ] ;
    except
        .#. у: с: _ ;

"{H} as һ only after vowels"
%{H%}:һ <=> :Vow/:0* _ ;
        except
            [ %{H%}: - :һ ] %{I%}: _ ;
